Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Chapter 831 Deferral

7-64-101. Eligibility for deferral. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

The legislative body of any county or municipality may provide by resolution that any single person age sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or any married couple of which both are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or any person who is totally and permanently disabled, who owns real property, and who uses and occupies such property as a place of residence, may apply to the county trustee of the county where such residence is located for a deferral of payment of all real property taxes on such residence.

[For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.] This part shall not apply to any single person age sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or to any married couple of which both are sixty-five (65) years of age or older or to any family group that has more than one (1) person residing permanently in the principal residence, whose combined gross income, as defined by the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.) is greater than twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) a year.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1; 1998, ch. 803, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 803, § 1 amended this section by substituting “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)” for “twelve thousand dollars ($12,000)” in (b). However, as provided in § 5 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Cross-References. Real property tax relief, title 67, ch. 5, part 7.

7-64-102. Limitations on property eligible for deferral. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

In the event the taxpayer's principal residence is on a farm or a parcel of land greater than one (1) acre, the tax deferral granted by this part shall only apply to the principal residence and no more than one (1) acre of land.

[For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.] The tax deferral granted by this part shall apply to no more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) of the appraised fair market value, as determined from the records of the county assessor of property.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1; 1998, ch. 803, § 2; 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 803, § 2 amended this section by deleting subsection (b). However, as provided in § 5 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See §1-1-116.

7-64-103. Application process. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

Applications for deferral of real property taxes shall be made annually on or before March 1 of each year, unless a later date for applications is provided by resolution of the legislative body of the county or municipality authorizing the program. Any applications received by the county trustee after this date shall be considered for deferral of real property taxes for the following tax year.

The state division of property assessments shall prepare an application form to be approved by the state board of equalization for such deferrals, which shall contain the following information and such additional information as may be required by the state board of equalization:

Name and address of the applicant or applicants;

Date and place of birth of the applicant or applicants;

Relationship between the applicants;

Description and location, by civil district, of the property;

Name of the person or persons holding title to the property;

Name and address of any mortgagee or lienholder;

The amount of any mortgage or lien against such property; and

Oath or verification of the information and disclosure by the applicant or applicants.

[For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.] Such application shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount of five dollars ($5.00) to be used to defray any expenses in the processing of such application.

The trustee or appropriate municipal official shall furnish the county assessor of property a copy of each application for deferral of property taxes. Whenever application for deferral of real property taxes is made, the county assessor of the county where the residence is located shall, within ninety (90) days, reassess such property claimed for deferral and forthwith notify the county trustee or the appropriate municipal official of the amount of the reassessment and value for tax purposes.

Such applications shall be available for public inspection during the normal business hours of the trustee's office.

After the trustee determines that the applicant meets the provisions of this part, the trustee shall approve such application only after receiving written approval from the holder of a note secured by any mortgage or deed of trust on such residence.

Notice of each approved application for deferral of taxes shall be furnished to the register of deeds by the trustee.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1; 1998, ch. 803, § 3; 2001, ch. 454, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 803, § 3 amended this section by substituting “six dollars ($6.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)” in (c). However, as provided in § 5 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

Cross-References. Applicability of provisions, §7-64-107.

7-64-104. Deferral — Lien for unpaid taxes. [For contingent amendment, see the Compiler's Notes.]

Whenever a deferral of real property taxes is granted, assessment of such taxes shall continue on an annual basis; however, they shall not become due and payable until the deferral is terminated.

The unpaid balance of assessed real property taxes shall constitute a lien against such property, and shall be subject to interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) a year. Such accrued taxes and such interest shall be a lien of the first priority on the property in the particular local government. Such a lien shall remain in effect until the taxes and interest are paid.

The tax deferrals created by this part shall not be subject to the statutory penalties imposed on delinquent taxes, and the lien created in the local government shall not be subject to any applicable statute of limitation.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1; 1998, ch. 803, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 803, § 4 amended this section by rewriting the first sentence of subsection (b) to read:

“The unpaid balance of assessed real property taxes shall constitute a lien against such property, and shall be subject to simple interest at the rate of six percent (6%) a year.”

However, as provided in § 5 of that act, the amendment shall have no effect unless approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the governing body of any county or municipality to which it may apply. Approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the governing body and so certified to the secretary of state.

7-64-105. Termination of deferral.

Deferrals on payment of real property taxes granted under the terms of this part shall be terminated:

Upon the death of the person to whom the deferral was granted and that person's surviving spouse if such spouse meets the terms and conditions of this chapter; or

When the residence is sold.

When such termination is by death, such taxes and interest shall be due and payable within eighteen (18) months of such termination or the settlement of the estate, whichever occurs first.

When such termination occurs as a result of the sale of the property, all unpaid taxes and interest on the taxes shall become due and payable within sixty (60) days. A deed for the sale of such property shall not be accepted for recordation in the office of the county register of deeds until all taxes and interest have been paid.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1.

7-64-106. Powers of state board of equalization.

The state board of equalization is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the administration of this part, and such rules and regulations shall be administered by the state division of property assessments.

Such board shall have jurisdiction to conduct through its hearing examiner a hearing regarding the complaint and appeal of any person or official arising under this chapter; provided, that notice of the complaint and appeal is received in the office of the executive secretary for the state board of equalization within forty-five (45) days of the date written notice is sent of the action that is the subject of the appeal.

Any action by the state board of equalization shall be final and conclusive, subject to judicial review.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1; 2001, ch. 454, § 2.

7-64-107. Applicability of provisions — Filing and approval of applications.

If this part is applicable only in a municipality, application may be made to the appropriate municipal official in accordance with subsections (b) and (c), and, upon approval of the application, a deferral of payment of real property taxes on such residence shall be granted as provided in this part.

When the property is within the boundaries of any municipality, the deferral of real property taxes may also apply to municipal real property taxes, and the trustee shall furnish a copy of each approved application to the appropriate official of such municipality.

If the deferral of real property taxes is effective in a municipality, the application shall be filed with and approved by the appropriate municipal official in the same manner as the trustee until this part is also effective in the county, after which the approval of the trustee shall be for both county and municipality.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1.

Cross-References. Application process, §7-64-103.

7-64-108. Construction of part.

It is the legislative intent that this part be strictly construed so that the benefits of this part shall be extended only as specifically provided for in this part.

Acts 1980, ch. 831, § 1.